src/noun-ciw-lex.txt
LEXICON Noun 

AN ; ! Animate nouns
IN ; ! Inanimate nouns
KINSHIP ;

LEXICON AN
ANSTEMS ; ! Absolutive (non-Px) declension



LEXICON IN

! Absolutive (non-Px) declension
INSTEMS ; 

! Possessive declension
@U.noun.1sg@:nin@U.noun.1sg@ INSTEMS ;
@U.noun.2sg@:gi@U.noun.2sg@ INSTEMS ;
@U.noun.3sg@:o@U.noun.3sg@ INSTEMS ;

@U.noun.1pl@:nin@U.noun.1pl@ INSTEMS ;   ! exclusive Pl
@U.noun.12pl@:gi@U.noun.12pl@ INSTEMS ; ! inclusive Pl
@U.noun.2pl@:gi@U.noun.2pl@ INSTEMS ;   
@U.noun.3pl@:o@U.noun.3pl@ INSTEMS ;


LEXICON KINSHIP 

@U.noun.1sg@:nin@U.noun.1sg@ KINSHIPSTEMS ;
@U.noun.2sg@:gi@U.noun.2sg@ KINSHIPSTEMS ;
@U.noun.3sg@:o@U.noun.3sg@ KINSHIPSTEMS ;

@U.noun.1pl@:nin@U.noun.1pl@ KINSHIPSTEMS ;   ! exclusive Pl
@U.noun.12pl@:gi@U.noun.12pl@ KINSHIPSTEMS ; ! inclusive Pl
@U.noun.2pl@:gi@U.noun.2pl@ KINSHIPSTEMS ;   
@U.noun.3pl@:o@U.noun.3pl@ KINSHIPSTEMS ;




! Animate Nouns
! =============
LEXICON ANSTEMS

inini ANDECL "man" ; 
ikwe ANDECL "woman" ; 
makwa ANDECL "bear" ; 
mitig ANDECL "tree" ; 
giizis ANDECL "sun, month" ; 
animikii ANDECL "thunder" ; 
miigwan ANDECL "feather" ; 
odaabaan ANDECL "car" ; 
akik ANDECL "kettle" ; 
ma'iingan ANDECL "wolf" ;
amik ANDECL "beaver" ;
giigoonh ANDECL "fish" ;
waabooz ANDECL "rabbit" ;
mikwam ANDECL "ice" ;



! Inanimate Nouns
! ===============
LEXICON INSTEMS

waakaa'igan INDECL "house" ; 
adopowin INDECL "table" ; 
waasechigan INDECL "window" ; 
zhoomin INDECL "grape" ; 
mitig INDECL "stick" ; 
aanakwad INDECL "cloud" ; 
zaaga'igan INDECL "lake" ; 
miikana INDECL "road" ; 
onaagaans INDECL "cup" ; 
ishkode INDECL "fire" ;
onaagan INDECL "dish" ;
mashkiki INDECL "plant" ;
ziibi INDECL "river" ;
makak INDECL "box" ;
abwi INDECL "paddle" ;


LEXICON KINSHIPSTEMS

baabaa KINDECL "father" ;
maamaa KINDECL "mother" ;
gosis KINDECL "son" ;
daanis KINDECL "daughter" ;
mishoomis KINDECL "grandfather" ;
ookomis KINDECL "grandmother" ;
saye KINDECL "elder brother" ;
